New York, session 2025-2026, S1859.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 520-f to read as follows: 3 § 520-f. Issuer cancellation. 1. Notice required. No issuer shall 4 close, cancel, or terminate a holder's account with the issuer for the 5 extension of credit through the use of a credit card without providing 6 the holder written notice via email, text message, or written letter at 7 least thirty days before the effective date of such closure, cancella- 8 tion, or termination. 9 2. Exceptions. The provisions of this section shall not apply if an 10 issuer closes, cancels, or terminates a holder's account with the issuer 11 for the extension of credit through the use of a credit card because of: 12 (a) fraud, misuse, identity theft, or unauthorized use affecting the 13 account; 14 (b) delinquency, default, or other failure by the holder to comply 15 with the terms and conditions governing the account; 16 (c) the holder's bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, death, legal 17 incapacity, or inability to repay or otherwise perform obligations under 18 the credit card agreement; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05393-02-6 S. 1859--A 2 1 (d) any federal, state, or local law, regulation, court order, legal 2 process, sanctions requirement, anti-money-laundering obligation, or 3 other governmental directive or restriction requiring or reasonably 4 necessitating such action. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 6 it shall have become a law.